Mississippi statutes. Title 43. Public Welfare
Youth Court Support Program

§ 43-21-801.
Youth Court Support Fund established; purpose; eligibility for funding; appropriation of funds; annual continuing juvenile justice education requirement.

There is established the Youth Court Support Program. The purpose of the program shall be to ensure that all youth courts have sufficient support funds to carry on the business of the youth court. The Administrative Office of Courts shall establish a formula consistent with this section for providing state support payable from the Youth Court Support Fund for the support of the youth courts.

Each regular youth court referee is eligible for youth court support funds so long as the senior chancellor does not elect to employ a youth court administrator as set forth in paragraph (b); a municipal youth court judge is also eligible. The Administrative Office of Courts shall direct any funds to the appropriate county or municipality. The funds shall be utilized to compensate an intake officer who shall be responsible for ensuring that all intake and case information for the Division of Youth Services, truancy matters and the Division of Family and Children’s Services is entered into the Mississippi Youth Court Information Delivery System (MYCIDS) in an accurate and timely manner. If the court already has an intake officer responsible for entering all cases of the Division of Youth Services, truancy matters and the Division of Family and Children’s Services into MYCIDS, the regular youth court referee or municipal court judge may certify to the Administrative Office of Courts that such a person is already on staff. In such a case, each regular youth court referee or municipal youth court judge shall have the sole individual discretion to appropriate those funds as expense monies to assist in hiring secretarial staff and acquiring materials and equipment incidental to carrying on the business of the court within the private practice of law of the referee or judge, or may direct the use of those funds through the county or municipal budget for court support supplies or services. The regular youth court referee and municipal youth court judge shall be accountable for assuring through private, county or municipal employees the proper preparation and filing of all necessary tracking and other documentation attendant to the administration of the youth court.

Title to all tangible property, excepting stamps, stationery and minor expendable office supplies, procured with funds authorized by this section, shall be and forever remain in the county or municipality to be used by the judge or referee during the term of his office and thereafter by his successors.

When permitted by the Administrative Office of Courts and as funds are available, the senior chancellor for Chancery Districts One, Two, Three, Four, Six, Seven, Nine, Ten, Thirteen, Fourteen, Fifteen and Eighteen may appoint a youth court administrator for the district whose responsibility will be to perform all reporting, tracking and other duties of a court administrator for all youth courts in the district that are under the chancery court system. Any chancery district listed in this paragraph in which a chancellor appoints a referee or special master to hear any youth court matter is ineligible for funding under this paragraph (b). The Administrative Office of Courts may allocate to an eligible chancery district a sum not to exceed Thirty Thousand Dollars ($30,000.00) per year for the salary, fringe benefits and equipment of the youth court administrator, and an additional sum not to exceed One Thousand Nine Hundred Dollars ($1,900.00) for the administrator’s travel expenses.

The appointment of a youth court administrator shall be evidenced by the entry of an order on the minutes of the court. The person appointed shall serve at the will and pleasure of the senior chancellor but shall be an employee of the Administrative Office of Courts.

The Administrative Office of Courts must approve the position, job description and salary before the position can be filled. The Administrative Office of Courts shall not approve any plan that does not first require the expenditure of the funds from the Youth Court Support Fund before expenditure of county funds is authorized for that purpose.

Title to any tangible property procured with funds authorized under this paragraph shall be and forever remain in the State of Mississippi.

Each county court is eligible for youth court support funds. The funds shall be utilized to provide compensation to an intake officer who shall be responsible for ensuring that all intake and case information for the Division of Youth Services, truancy matters and the Division of Family and Children’s Services is entered into the Mississippi Youth Court Information Delivery System (MYCIDS) in an accurate and timely manner. If the county court already has an intake officer or other staff person responsible for entering all cases of the Division of Youth Services, truancy matters and the Division of Family and Children’s Services into MYCIDS, the senior county court judge may certify that such a person is already on staff. In such a case, the senior county court judge shall have discretion to direct the expenditure of those funds in hiring other support staff to carry on the business of the court.

For the purposes of this paragraph, “support staff” means court administrators, law clerks, legal research assistants, secretaries, resource administrators or case managers appointed by a youth court judge, or any combination thereof, but shall not mean school attendance officers.

The appointment of support staff shall be evidenced by the entry of an order on the minutes of the court. The support staff so appointed shall serve at the will and pleasure of the senior county court judge but shall be an employee of the county.

The Administrative Office of Courts must approve the positions, job descriptions and salaries before the positions may be filled. The Administrative Office of Courts shall not approve any plan that does not first require the expenditure of funds from the Youth Court Support Fund before expenditure of county funds is authorized for that purpose.

The Administrative Office of Courts may approve expenditure from the fund for additional equipment for support staff appointed pursuant to this paragraph if the additional expenditure falls within the formula. Title to any tangible property procured with funds authorized under this paragraph shall be and forever remain in the county to be used by the youth court and support staff.

(i) The formula developed by the Administrative Office of Courts for providing youth court support funds shall be devised so as to distribute appropriated funds proportional to caseload and other appropriate factors as set forth in regulations promulgated by the Administrative Office of Courts. The formula will determine a reasonable maximum amount per judge or referee per annum that will not be exceeded in allocating funds under this section.

The formula shall be reviewed by the Administrative Office of Courts every two (2) years to ensure that the youth court support funds provided herein are proportional to each youth court’s caseload and other specified factors.

The Administrative Office of Courts shall have wide latitude in the first two-year cycle to implement a formula designed to maximize caseload data collection.

Application to receive funds under this section shall be submitted in accordance with procedures established by the Administrative Office of Courts.

Approval of the use of any of the youth court support funds distributed under this section shall be made by the Administrative Office of Courts in accordance with procedures established by the Administrative Office of Courts.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the “Youth Court Support Fund,” which shall consist of funds appropriated or otherwise made available by the Legislature in any manner and funds from any other source designated for deposit into such fund. Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any investment earnings or interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. Monies in the fund shall be distributed to the youth courts by the Administrative Office of Courts for the purposes described in this section.

During the regular legislative session held in calendar year 2007, the Legislature may appropriate an amount not to exceed Two Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($2,500.000.00) to the Youth Court Support Fund.

During each regular legislative session subsequent to the 2007 Regular Session, the Legislature shall appropriate Two Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($2,500,000.00) to the Youth Court Support Fund.

No youth court judge or youth court referee shall be eligible to receive funding from the Youth Court Support Fund who has not received annual continuing education in the field of juvenile justice in an amount to conform with the requirements of the Rules and Regulations for Mandatory Continuing Judicial Education promulgated by the Supreme Court. The Administrative Office of Courts shall maintain records of all referees and youth court judges regarding such training and shall not disburse funds to any county or municipality for the budget of a youth court judge or referee who is not in compliance with the judicial training requirements.

Any recipient of funds from the Youth Court Support Fund shall not be eligible for continuing disbursement of funds if the recipient is not in compliance with the terms, conditions and reporting requirements set forth in the procedures promulgated by the Administrative Office of Courts.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 539, § 7; Laws, 2007, ch. 557, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 418, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 43-21-803.
Tony Gobar Individualized Assessment and Comprehensive Community Intervention Initiative (IACCII) Program established; purposes; eligibility for grants; programs and services; application for assistance; Tony Gobar “IACCII” Fund created.

There is established the Tony Gobar Individualized Assessment and Comprehensive Community Intervention Initiative (IACCII) Program for the purposes of:

Providing comprehensive strength-based needs assessments, individualized treatment plans and community-based services for certain youth who would otherwise be committed to the training schools. The IACCII ensures that youth and their families can access necessary services available in their home communities; and

Providing grants to faith-based organizations and nonprofit 501(c)(3) organizations that develop and operate community-based alternatives to the training schools and detention centers. In order to be eligible for a grant under this paragraph, a faith-based or nonprofit 501(c)(3) organization in cooperation with a youth court must develop and operate a juvenile justice alternative sanction designed for delinquent youths. The program must be designed to decrease reliance on commitment in juvenile detention facilities and training schools.

Programs established pursuant to this subsection must not duplicate existing programs or services and must incorporate best practices principles and positive behavioral interventions. The Department of Human Services shall have sole authority and power to determine the programs to be funded pursuant to this section.

A faith-based or nonprofit 501(c)(3) must submit an application to the Department of Human Services. The application must include a description of the purpose for which assistance is requested, the amount of assistance requested and any other information required by the Department of Human Services.

The Department of Human Services shall have all powers necessary to implement and administer the program established under this section, and the department shall promulgate rules and regulations, in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, necessary for the implementation of this section.

There is created in the State Treasury a special fund to be designated as the “Tony Gobar IACCII Fund,” which shall consist of funds appropriated or otherwise made available by the Legislature in any manner and funds from any other source designated for deposit into such fund. Unexpended amounts remaining in the fund at the end of a fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund, and any investment earnings or interest earned on amounts in the fund shall be deposited to the credit of the fund. Monies in the fund shall be used by the Division of Youth Services for the purposes described in this section.

During the regular legislative session held in calendar year 2007, the Legislature may appropriate an amount not to exceed Two Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($2,500,000.00) to the Tony Gobar IACCII Fund.

During each regular legislative session subsequent to the 2007 Regular Session, the Legislature shall appropriate Two Million Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($2,500,000.00) to the Tony Gobar IACCII Fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2006, ch. 539, § 8; Laws, 2007, ch. 557, § 2; Laws, 2009, ch. 498, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 427, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2012.